Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Chapter 3

Investment of Trust Funds

35-3-101. Authority of court.

The court is authorized to have the money and funds in the hands of clerks and receivers, or trustees, in litigation or under the control of the court, invested under such rules and orders in each case as may be legal and just.

Acts 1865, ch. 19, § 1; Shan., § 5433; mod. Code 1932, § 9592; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-301.

Cross-References. Investment of funds of minors and incompetents, § 18-5-105.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 737.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 21; 14 Tenn. Juris., Guardian and Ward, §§ 8, 9; 24 Tenn. Juris., Trusts and Trustees, § 58.

Law Reviews.

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: A Fresh Look at State Asset Protection Trust Statutes, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1741 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Unconstitutional Perpetual Trusts, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1769 (2014).

35-3-102. Authorized investments.

All trustees, guardians and other fiduciaries in this state, unless prohibited, or another mode of investment is prescribed by the will or deed of the testator or other person establishing the trust, may invest all funds in their hands in securities specified in §§ 35-3-103 — 35-3-111, and may also invest funds in income-producing commercial or residential property.

Acts 1931, ch. 100, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-302; Acts 2016, ch. 640, § 3.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added “, and may also invest funds in income-producing commercial or residential property.” at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 640, § 4. March 23, 2016.

Law Reviews.

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

35-3-103. Federal and state securities.

Investments may be made in bonds, notes and stock of the United States and any state and territory of the United States.

In the absence of an express provision to the contrary, if an indenture or other governing instrument directs, requires, authorizes or permits investment in United States government obligations, a bank, trust company, trust department or other fiduciary may invest in the obligations, either directly or in the form of securities or other interests in any open end or closed end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.), if the portfolio of the investment company or investment trust is limited to United States government obligations and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by the obligations and if the investment company or investment trust actually takes delivery of the collateral, either directly or through an authorized custodian.

Acts 1931, ch. 100, § 1(a); C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.1(A); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-303; Acts 1987, ch. 89, § 1; 2008, ch. 672, § 1.

Cross-References. See notes to § 35-3-102.

35-3-104. Securities of foreign governments.

Investments may be made in bonds, notes and stock issued or guaranteed by any foreign government with which the United States is at the time of sale or offer of sale of the bonds, notes or stock maintaining diplomatic relations and which foreign government has not, for at least thirty (30) years prior to the making of the investment, defaulted for more than thirty (30) days in the payment of any part either of principal or interest of any bond, note, stock or other evidence of indebtedness issued by it; provided, that if the foreign government has not been in existence for as much as thirty (30) years, but has been in existence for not less than ten (10) years, then the investment may be made in securities issued or guaranteed by it, if it has not defaulted in the payment of any part either of principal or interest of any bond, note, stock or other evidence of indebtedness issued by it since it has been in existence.

Acts 1931, ch. 100, § 1(b); C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.1(B); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-304.

Cross-References. See notes to § 35-3-102.

35-3-105. Bonds of counties.

Investments may be made in bonds of any county in the state and bonds of any city or town in the state having a population of not less than two thousand (2,000) by the last federal census preceding the investment, regardless of whether the bonds are payable from taxes levied on property in the county, city or town, or are payable solely from revenues of the waterworks system, electric distribution system or both owned and operated by the issuing county, city or town, or are payable from both taxes and revenues; provided, that the county, city or town has not defaulted within fifteen (15) years preceding the investment, for more than ninety (90) days, in the payment of any part of either principal or interest on any bond, note or other evidence of valid indebtedness.

Before any funds may be invested in bonds payable solely from waterworks, electric revenue or both, there shall be furnished with the bonds a certified copy of an operating statement issued by the official in charge of the operations of the waterworks or electric distribution systems, showing that the net revenue from the system or systems pledged to and available for the principal of and interest on all outstanding bonds payable from that revenue, covering a period of twelve (12) consecutive months out of the fifteen (15) months preceding the investment, have been at least one and one-third (11/3) times the highest combined principal and interest requirements for any one (1) year on all bonds then outstanding that are payable from the pledged revenues of the system or systems.

“Net revenue” means total revenue less operating expenses incurred in connection with the operation of the system or systems.

Acts 1931, ch. 100, § 1(c); 1939, ch. 143, § 1; 1949, ch. 275, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.1(C); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-305.

Compiler's Notes. For table of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. See notes to § 35-3-102.

35-3-106. Municipal bonds.

Investments may be made in bonds and notes of any county, city or town in any state or territory of the United States that has a population, as shown by the last federal census next preceding the investment, of not less than forty-five thousand (45,000) and has not defaulted within twenty-five (25) years next preceding the investment, for more than thirty (30) days, in the payment of any part of either principal or interest of any bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness.

Acts 1931, ch. 100, § 1(e); C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.1(D); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-306.

Compiler's Notes. For table of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. See notes to § 35-3-102.

35-3-107. Real estate bonds and notes.

Investments may be made in bonds and notes secured by first mortgage or deed of trust on real estate located in this state; provided, that:

The face or principal amount of the bonds or notes does not exceed one half (½) the actual value of the real estate as appraised by one (1) or more licensed real estate dealers acting for unincorporated trustees, guardians or other fiduciaries, and in case of incorporated trustees, guardians or other fiduciaries, the appraisal shall be made by an agent or committee composed of or selected by the board of directors or executive committee of the incorporated trustee, guardian or other fiduciary;

The trustee, guardian or other fiduciary or any institution controlled by that entity or person has not received any commission from the borrower or issuer in the making of the mortgage or deed of trust or the underwriting of the securities secured by the mortgage or deed of trust, unless the commission charged the borrower or issuer does not exceed one percent (1%) per annum of the aggregate principal amount of the bonds or notes; and

Any probate or chancery court of the county where the fiduciary is located, upon the application of any beneficiary of the trust or of any person connected with any beneficiary, by consanguinity or affinity, within the sixth degree as computed by the civil law, may, at any time, either restrain the making of any such proposed investment, if the investment is not consummated, or if consummated, require the fiduciary promptly to dispose of the bonds or notes at the best price then obtainable and otherwise reinvest the funds, and the court may exercise such power to restrain or compel disposal in all cases in which the court may find that action to be necessary to protect the interest of any beneficiary.

Acts 1931, ch. 100, § 1(f); C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.1(E); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-307.

Cross-References. See notes to § 35-3-102.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee and the Installment Land Contract: A Viable Alternative to the Deed of Trust, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 551 (1991).

35-3-108. Railroad obligations.

Investments may be made in the following railroad obligations:

Obligations issued, assumed or guaranteed as to principal and interest by endorsement, or so guaranteed, which guaranty has been assumed;

Obligations for the payment of the principal and interest of which a railroad corporation such as is described in this section is obligated under the terms of a lease made or assumed; or

Equipment trust obligations in respect of which liability has been incurred by a railroad corporation incorporated under the laws of the United States, or any state of the United States, and owning and operating within the United States not less than five hundred (500) miles of standard-gauge railroad line, exclusive of sidings, or if the mileage so owned is less than five hundred (500) miles, the railroad operating revenues from the operation of all railroads operated by it, including the revenues from the operation of all railroads controlled through ownership of all, except directors' qualifying shares, of the voting stock of the owning corporation, was not less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) each year for at least five (5) of the six (6) fiscal years next preceding the investment.

Provided, that:

In each year for at least five (5) of the six (6) fiscal years and in the last fiscal year next preceding the investment, the amount of income of such railroad corporation available for its fixed charges, as defined in subsection (c), was not less than one and one-half (1½) times its fixed charges, as defined in subsection (c);

In each year for at least five (5) of the six (6) fiscal years next preceding the investment, the railroad corporation has paid dividends in cash upon its capital stock equivalent to at least one fourth (¼) of its fixed charges, or if the railroad corporation has not paid such dividends, that the amount of income available for its fixed charges was not less than one and one half (1½) times its fixed charges for at least nine (9) of the ten (10) fiscal years and in the last fiscal year next preceding the investment;

At no time within the period of six (6) years has the railroad corporation failed regularly and punctually to pay the matured principal and interest of all its mortgage indebtedness; and

The security, if any, for the obligations shall be property wholly or in part within the United States and the obligations shall be:

Fixed interest-bearing bonds secured by direct mortgage on railroad owned or operated by the railroad corporation;

Bonds secured by first mortgage upon terminal, depot or tunnel property, including lands, buildings and appurtenances, used in the service of transportation by one (1) or more railroad corporations; provided, that the bonds are the direct obligation of, or that payment of principal and interest of the bonds are guaranteed by, endorsement by or guaranteed by endorsement, which guaranty has been assumed by, one (1) or more railroad corporations;

Equipment trust obligations, comprising bonds, notes and certificates, issued in connection with the purchase for use on railroads of new standard-gauge rolling stock through the medium of an equipment trust agreement, and which obligations, so long as any of them are outstanding and unpaid or unprovided for, shall be secured by an instrument:

Vesting title to the equipment in a trustee free of encumbrance; or

Creating a first lien on the equipment, or, pending the vesting of title, by the deposit of cash in trust to an amount equal to the face amount of the obligations issued in respect of the equipment, title to which is not yet so vested; provided, that the maximum amount of the obligations so issuable shall not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the cost of the equipment; and provided further, that the owner, purchaser or lessee, or the owners, purchasers or lessees, of the equipment shall be obligated by the terms of the obligations or of the instrument to:

Maintain the equipment in proper repair;

Replace any of the equipment that may be destroyed or released with other equipment of equal value, or, if released in connection with a sale of the equipment, to deposit the proceeds of the sale in trust for the benefit of the holders of the obligations pending replacement of the equipment;

Pay any and all taxes or other governmental charges that may be required by law to be paid upon the equipment;

Pay, in accordance with the provisions of the obligations or of the instrument, to holders, or to the trustee for the benefit of holders, of the obligations the amount of interest due on the obligations or of the dividends payable in respect of the obligations; and

Pay the amount of the entire issue of the obligations in annual or semiannual installments each year throughout a period of not exceeding fifteen (15) years from the first date of issue of any of the obligations that the amount of the respective unmatured installments at any time outstanding shall be approximately equal; provided, that unless the owner, purchaser or lessee of the equipment, or one (1) or more of the owners, purchasers or lessees shall be a railroad corporation as is described in and meets the requirements of this section preceding subdivision (b)(4)(A), the obligations shall be guaranteed by endorsements as to principal and as to interest or dividends by the railroad corporation;

Bonds of the railroad corporation secured by irrevocable pledge as collateral under a trust agreement of other railroad bonds that are legal investment for fiduciaries under this section, have a maturity not earlier than the bonds that they secure and of a total face amount not less than the total face amount of the bonds that they secure; or

Fixed interest-bearing mortgage bonds other than those described in subdivisions (b)(4)(A) and (B), income mortgage bonds, collateral trust bonds or obligations other than those described in subdivision (b)(4)(D), or unsecured bonds or obligations, issued, assumed or guaranteed as to principal and interest by endorsement by, or so guaranteed, which guaranty has been assumed by, the railroad corporation; provided, that in each year for at least five (5) of the six (6) fiscal years and in the last fiscal year next preceding the investment:

The amount of income of the railroad corporation available for its fixed charges, as defined in subsection (c), was not less than twice the sum of:

Its fixed charges, as defined in subsection (c); and

Full interest on the income mortgage bonds, if any;

The net income of which after deductions was not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and

The railroad corporation has made the dividend and principal and interest payments required by subdivisions (b)(4)(C)(ii)(d ) and (e ).

The amount of income available for fixed charges shall be the amount obtained by deducting from gross income all items deductible in ascertaining net income other than contingent income interest and those constituting fixed charges. Fixed charges shall be rent for leased roads, miscellaneous rents, fixed interest on funded debt, interest on unfunded debt and amortization of discount on funded debt.

Accounting terms used in this section shall be deemed to refer to those used in the accounting reports prescribed by the accounting regulations for common carriers subject to the Interstate Commerce Act (U.S.C. Title 49). If the interstate commerce commission prescribes accounting regulations in which are defined the terms “income available for fixed charges” and “fixed charges,” the definitions of those terms as so prescribed shall be taken and used in lieu of the definitions set forth in subsection (c) for all purposes.

For purposes of this section, the revenues, earnings, income and fixed charges of, and dividends paid by, any railroad corporation, all or substantially all of the railroad lines of which have been acquired through merger, consolidations, conveyance or lease by another railroad corporation and remain in its possession, shall be deemed to be revenues, earnings, income and fixed charges of, and dividends paid by, the latter corporation.

Not more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the assets of any trust shall be loaned or invested in the bonds, notes and certificates in this section defined, and not more than ten percent (10%) of the assets shall be invested in such bonds, notes and certificates for which any one (1) railroad corporation shall be obligated.

Acts 1931, ch. 100, § 1(g); C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.1(F); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-308.

Cross-References. See notes to § 35-3-102.

35-3-109. Public utility bonds.

Investments may be made in the bonds of any corporation that at the time of the investment is incorporated under the laws of the United States or any state of the United States, or the District of Columbia, and transacting the business of supplying electrical energy or artificial gas or both for light, heat, power and other purposes; provided, that at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the gross operating revenues of any such corporation are derived from that business, and not more than fifteen percent (15%) of the gross operating revenues, are derived from any one (1) kind of business other than supplying electricity and gas; and provided further, that corporation is subject to regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission or a public utility commission, or other similar regulatory body duly established by the laws of the United States or the states in which such corporation operates, subject to the following conditions:

The corporation has all franchises necessary to operate in territory in which at least seventy-five percent (75%) of its gross income is earned, which franchises shall either be indeterminate permits or agreements with or subject to the jurisdiction of the Tennessee public utility commission, or other duly constituted regulatory body, or extend at least five (5) years beyond the maturity of the bonds;

The outstanding full paid capital stock of the corporation is equal to at least two thirds (2/3) of the total debt secured by mortgage lien on any part or all of its property; provided, that in case of a corporation having nonpar value shares, the amount of capital that such shares represent is the capital as shown by the books of the corporation;

The corporation has been in existence for a period of not less than eight (8) fiscal years and at no time within the period of eight (8) fiscal years next preceding the date of the investment has the corporation failed to pay promptly and regularly the matured principal and interest of all its indebtedness direct, assumed or guaranteed, but the period of life of the corporation, together with the period of life of any predecessor corporation or corporations from which a major portion of its property was acquired by consolidation, merger or purchase shall be considered together in determining the required period;

For a period of five (5) fiscal years next preceding the investment the net earnings of the corporation have averaged per year not less than twice the average annual interest charges on its total funded debt applicable to that period, and for the last fiscal year preceding the investment its net earnings have been not less than twice the interest charges for a full year on its total funded debt outstanding at the time of the investment, and for that period the gross operating revenues of any such corporation have averaged per year not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and the corporation has for each year either earned an amount available for dividends or paid in dividends an amount equal to four percent (4%) upon a sum equivalent to two thirds (2/3) of its funded debt;

The bonds must be part of an issue of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) and must be mortgage bonds secured by a first or refunding mortgage secured by property owned and operated by the corporation issuing or assuming them, or must be underlying mortgage bonds secured by property owned and operated by the corporations issuing or assuming them. The bonds are to be refunded by a junior mortgage providing for their retirement; provided, that the bonds under the junior mortgage comply with the requirements of this section and that the underlying mortgage is either a closed mortgage or remains open solely for the issue of additional bonds which are to be pledged under the junior mortgage. The aggregate principal amount of bonds secured by the first or refunding mortgage plus the principal amount of all the underlying outstanding bonds shall not exceed sixty percent (60%) of the value of the physical property owned as shown by the books of the corporation and subject to the lien of the mortgage or mortgages securing the total mortgage debt; and provided further, that, if a refunding mortgage, it must provide for the retirement on or before the date of their maturity of all bonds secured by prior liens on the property; and

Not more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the assets of any trust shall be loaned on or invested in bonds of electric and gas corporations, and not more than ten percent (10%) of the assets of any trust shall be invested in the bonds of any one such corporation, as authorized by this section.

In determining the qualifications of any bond under this section where a corporation has acquired its property or any substantial part thereof within five (5) years immediately preceding the date of the investment by consolidation or merger, or by the purchase of all or a substantial portion of the property of any other corporation or corporations, the gross operating revenues, net earnings and interest charges of the several predecessor or constituent corporations shall be consolidated and adjusted so as to ascertain whether there has been compliance with the requirements of subdivision (a)(4).

The gross operating revenues and expenses of a corporation, for the purposes of this section, shall be, respectively, the total amount earned from the operation of, and the total expense of maintaining and operating all property owned and operated by or leased and operated by the corporation, as determined by the system of accounts prescribed by the Tennessee public utility commission, public utility commission or other similar regulatory body having jurisdiction in the matter. The gross operating revenues and expenses, as defined in this subdivision (c)(1), of subsidiary companies may be included; provided, that all the mortgage bonds and a controlling interest in stock or stocks of the subsidiary companies are pledged as part security for the mortgage debt of the principal company; and

The net earnings of any corporation, for the purpose of this section, shall be the balance obtained by deducting from its gross operating revenues, its operating and maintenance expenses, taxes other than federal and state income taxes, rentals and provision for renewals and retirements of the physical assets of the corporation, and by adding to the balance its income from securities and miscellaneous sources, but not, however, to exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the balance;

Acts 1931, ch. 100, § 1(h); C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.1(G); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-309; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 100; 2017, ch. 94, § 34.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (a), (a)(1), and (c)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. See notes to § 35-3-102.

35-3-110. Telephone corporation bonds.

Investments may be made in the bonds of any corporation that at the time of the investment is incorporated under the laws of the United States or any state of the United States, or the District of Columbia, and is authorized to engage and is engaging in the business of furnishing telephone service in the United States, and provided the corporation is subject to regulation by the interstate commerce commission or a regulatory authority, or public utility commission or other similar federal or state regulatory body duly established by the laws of the United States or the states in which the corporation operates, subject to the following conditions:

The corporation has been in existence for a period of not less than eight (8) fiscal years and at no time within that period of eight (8) fiscal years next preceding the date of the investment has the corporation failed to pay promptly and regularly the matured principal and interest of all its indebtedness direct, assumed or guaranteed, but the period of life of the corporation, together with the period of life of any predecessor corporation or corporations from which a major portion of its property was acquired by consolidation, merger or purchase, shall be considered together in determining the required period;

The outstanding full paid capital stock of the corporation is at the time of the investment equal to at least two thirds (2/3) of the total debt secured by all mortgage liens on any part or all of its property;

For a period of five (5) fiscal years next preceding the investment, the net earnings of the corporation have averaged per year not less than twice the average annual interest charges on its total funded debt applicable to that period, and for the last fiscal year preceding the investment, the net earnings have been not less than twice the interest charges for a full year on its total funded debt outstanding at the time of the investment, and for that period, the gross operating revenues of the corporation have averaged per year not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000), and the corporation has for each of those years either earned an amount available for dividends or paid in dividends an amount equal to four percent (4%) upon all of its outstanding capital stock; and

The bonds must be part of an issue of not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) and must be secured by a first or refunding mortgage, and the aggregate principal amount of bonds secured by the first or refunding mortgage, plus the principal amount of all underlying outstanding bonds, shall not exceed sixty percent (60%) of the value of the property, real and personal, owned absolutely and subject to the lien of the mortgage; provided, that, if a refunding mortgage, it must provide for the retirement of all bonds secured by prior liens on the property. Not more than thirty-three and one third percent (331/3%) of the property constituting the specific security for the bonds may consist of stock or unsecured obligations of affiliated or other telephone companies, or both.

In determining the qualification of any bond under this section, where a corporation has acquired its property or any substantial part of its property within five (5) years immediately preceding the date of the investment by consolidation or merger or by the purchase of all or a substantial portion of the property of any other corporation or corporations, the gross operating revenues, net earnings and interest charges of the several predecessor or constituent corporations shall be consolidated and adjusted so as to ascertain whether there has been compliance with the requirements of subdivision (a)(3).

The gross operating revenues and expenses of a corporation, for the purpose of this section, shall be respectively the total amount earned from the operation of, and the total expense of maintaining and operating, all property owned and operated by or leased and operated by the corporation, as determined by the system of accounts prescribed by the interstate commerce commission or the Tennessee public utility commission, or public utility commission, or other similar federal or state regulatory body having jurisdiction in the matter.

The net earnings of any corporation, for the purpose of this section, shall be the balance obtained by deducting from its gross operating revenues its operating and maintenance expenses, provision for depreciation of the physical assets of the corporation, taxes other than federal and state income taxes, rentals and miscellaneous charges, and by adding to the balance its income from securities and miscellaneous sources, but not, however, to exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the balance. “Funded debt” means all interest bearing debts maturing more than one (1) year from date of issue.

Not more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the assets of any trust shall be loaned on or invested in bonds of telephone corporations, and not more than ten percent (10%) of the assets of any trust shall be invested in the bonds of any one (1) telephone corporation, as authorized by this section.

Acts 1931, ch. 100, § 1(i); C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.1(H); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-310; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 101; 2017, ch. 94, § 35.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. See notes to § 35-3-102.

35-3-111. Obligations of certain federal agencies.

Trustees, guardians and other fiduciaries may also invest in or lend on the following obligations issued by the following authorized federal agencies:

Bonds and/or debentures issued by a federal home loan bank organized under the “Federal Home Loan Bank Act” (47 Stat. 725, 12 U.S.C. § 1421 et seq.);

Stock of federal savings and loan associations organized under the “Home Owner's Loan Act of 1933” (48 Stat. 128, 12 U.S.C. § 1461 et seq.), and amendments to that act, and/or building and loan associations, licensed to do business in Tennessee, where the stock of the associations is insured by the federal savings and loan insurance corporation;

Notes, bonds, debentures or other obligations issued under title IV of the act of congress of the United States entitled “National Housing Act,” approved June 27, 1934 (48 Stat. 1246, 12 U.S.C. § 1701 et seq.), and any amendments thereto; and

Mortgages guaranteed or insured under title III of the act of congress of the United States, entitled “Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944,” approved June 22, 1944 (58 Stat. 284, 38 U.S.C. § 1801 et seq. [repealed]), and any amendments thereto.

Acts 1935 (E.S.), ch. 36, § 1; 1939, ch. 73, § 1; 1949, ch. 175, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.1(I); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-311.

Compiler's Notes. Some of the provisions in (2) may be obsolete. The federal savings and loan insurance corporation no longer exists.

Title III of the Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944, referred to in subdivision (4), was repealed by Act Sept. 2, 1958, P.L. 85-857, § 14(87), 72 Stat. 1273. For present law, see 38 U.S.C. § 3701 et seq.

Cross-References. See notes to § 35-3-102.

35-3-112. State and federal bond issues — Reports.

Guardians, executors, administrators and trustees shall also be authorized and empowered to invest money and funds in their hands in the bonds of the state, of the United States, or obligations issued separately or collectively by or for federal land banks, federal intermediate credit banks and banks for cooperatives under the act of congress known as the Farm Credit Act of 1971 (85 Stat. 583, 12 U.S.C. § 2001 et seq.) and amendments to that act, or in obligations issued under the Home Owner's Loan Act of congress (12 U.S.C. § 1461 et seq.), or notes or bonds secured by mortgage or trust deed insured by the federal housing administrator, or bonds and/or debentures issued by national mortgage associations; also to lend on the security of any such bonds to the extent of eighty-five percent (85%) of their face value; and, in either case, make report thereof to the court where the guardian, executor, administrator or trustee is qualified, unless another mode of investment is required by will or deed of the testator or another person who has established the funds.

Acts 1865, ch. 19, § 2; Shan., § 4281; Acts 1925, ch. 9, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 4281a4; mod. Code 1932, § 8497; Acts 1935, ch. 136, § 1; 1935, ch. 187, § 1; 1937, ch. 75, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8497; Acts 1976, ch. 585, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-312.

35-3-113. Life, endowment or annuity contracts of life insurance companies.

Executors, trustees and guardians are authorized, with the approval of a probate court or other court of competent jurisdiction, to invest out of income or principal of funds in their custody, in single or annual premium life, endowment or annuity contracts of legal reserve life insurance companies duly licensed and qualified to transact business within the state.

Such contracts may be issued on the life or lives of any beneficiary, cestui que trust or ward, who may have a vested or contingent interest in the estate, or on the life or lives of any parent, trustor or other person in whom any beneficiary, cestui que trust or ward may have an insurable interest, and shall such be so drawn that the legal title of the policy or contract shall be in and the proceeds or avails of the proceeds payable to and in the control of the fiduciary making the investment, and may be retained and shall be subject to transfer, assignment and conveyance by the fiduciary as other personal property held in the account.

Acts 1939, ch. 133, §§ 1-3; 1945, ch. 150, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-313; Acts 2010, ch. 725, § 22.

Law Reviews.

Some Aspects of Estate Planning in Tennessee (Alec Brock Stevenson), 2 Vand. L. Rev. 265 (1949).

35-3-114. Certificates of deposit and savings accounts.

All trustees and guardians in this state, unless prohibited, or another mode of investment is prescribed, by the will or deed of the testator or other person establishing the trust, may invest trust funds in their hands, in addition to the investments heretofore authorized, in certificates of deposit of, and savings accounts in, any national or state bank in the United States, including itself if such trustee or guardian is a national or state bank in the United States otherwise qualified, whose deposits are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation, at the prevailing rate of interest of such certificates or savings accounts. No trustee or guardian shall invest in such certificates of deposit of, or savings accounts in any one (1) bank, an amount from any one (1) fund in the trustee's or guardian's care in excess of such amount as is fully insured as a deposit in the bank by the federal deposit insurance corporation, unless the investment is first approved by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 1939, ch. 170, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.3 (Williams, § 9596.7); Acts 1975, ch. 331, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-314; Acts 1989, ch. 288, § 1.

35-3-115. Public housing authority obligations.

Notwithstanding any restrictions on investments contained in any laws of this state, the state and all public officers, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, and public bodies, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies, insurance associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority pursuant to the Housing Authorities Law, compiled in title 13, chapter 20, and any amendments to that law, or issued pursuant to the Memphis Housing Authority Law, chapter 615 of the Private Acts of 1935, as amended by chapter 900 of the Private Acts of 1937, and any amendments to that law, or issued by any public housing authority or agency in the United States, when the bonds or other obligations are secured by a pledge of annual contributions to be paid by the United States government or any agency of the United States government. The bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits, it being the purpose of this section to authorize any persons, firms, corporations, associations, political subdivisions, bodies and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them, including, but not limited to, sinking, insurance, investment, retirement, compensation, pension and trust funds, and funds held on deposit, for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall be construed as relieving any person, firm or corporation from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

Acts 1939, ch. 155, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9596.4 (Williams, § 9596.8); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-315.